Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-710.03
Land devoted to agricultural purposes; acquisition to construct power transmission lines; route selected.

Whenever a condemner seeks to acquire lands or interest therein through eminent domain proceedings to construct power transmission lines through or over land devoted to agricultural purposes, such condemner shall be required to select a route along or following sections or one-half section lines unless such route cannot be followed without excessive and unreasonable costs to the condemner.

Laws 1978, LB 917, § 5.